Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB796.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2116(a)(1) and (1.3) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are amended to read:Section 2116. Inheritance Tax.--(a) (1) Inheritance tax upon the transfer of property passing to or for the use of any of the following shall be at the rate [of four and one-half per cent:] imposed under section 302 on each dollar of income that is received by every resident individual, estate or trust and on each dollar of income that is received by every nonresident 12345678910111213141516171819202122 individual, estate or trust, not to exceed three and seven hundredths per cent:(i) grandfather, grandmother, father, mother, except transfers under subclause (1.2), and lineal descendants; or(ii) wife or widow and husband or widower of a child.* * *(1.3) Inheritance tax upon the transfer of property passing to or for the use of a sibling shall be at the rate [of twelve per cent.] imposed under section 302 on each dollar of income that is received by every resident individual, estate or trust and on each dollar of income that is received by every nonresident individual, estate or trust, not to exceed three and seven hundredths per cent.* * *Section 2. The amendment of section 2116(a)(1) and (1.3) of the act shall apply to estates of decedents dying after June 30, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0796PN0820 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718